Vermont statutes. Title 26 Professions and Occupations
Subchapter 3. Licensure

§ 2101.
Eligibility.

An applicant for a license as a physical therapist shall:

be a graduate of a professional physical therapy education program accredited by a national accreditation agency approved by the Director;

pass an examination approved by the Director; and

pass an approved English proficiency exam if the applicant’s native language is not English.

An applicant for a license as a physical therapist who has been educated outside the United States and has graduated from a professional physical therapy education program not accredited by a national accreditation agency approved by the Director shall:

provide satisfactory evidence that the applicant’s education is substantially equivalent to the requirements of physical therapists educated in an accredited education program as determined by the Director. For the purpose of this section, “substantially equivalent” means that an applicant for licensure educated outside the United States shall have:

graduated from a physical therapist education program that prepares the applicant to engage in the practice of physical therapy without restriction;

provided written proof that the applicant’s school of physical therapy education is recognized by its own ministry or department of education;

undergone a credentials evaluation as directed by the Director that demonstrates that the candidate has met uniform criteria for educational requirements as adopted by rule; and

completed any additional education as required by the Director;

pass an approved English proficiency examination if the applicant’s native language is not English; and

pass an examination approved by the Director.

An applicant for licensure as a physical therapist assistant shall:

be a graduate of a physical therapist assistant education program accredited by a national accreditation agency approved by the Director;

pass an approved English proficiency examination if the applicant’s native language is not English; and

pass an examination approved by the Director.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 227

(Adj. Sess.), § 6; amended

1989, No. 250

(Adj. Sess.), § 4(d);

2005, No. 27

, § 59.

§ 2102.
Application.

Unless entitled to licensure under section 2104 of this title, and according to the procedures outlined in the rules of the Director of the Office of Professional Regulation, a person who desires to be licensed as a physical therapist or physical therapist assistant shall apply to the Director in writing on a form furnished by the Director, accompanied by payment of the specified fee.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 227

(Adj. Sess.), § 6; amended

1989, No. 250

(Adj. Sess.), § 4(d).

§ 2103.
Examination.

The Director of the Office of Professional Regulation shall provide for examinations for licensure as physical therapists or physical therapist assistants at such times and places as he or she may determine.

Examinations administered and procedures followed by the Director shall be fair and reasonable and shall be designed and implemented to reasonably ensure that an applicant is at least minimally qualified to practice physical therapy. They shall not be designed or implemented for the purpose of limiting the number of licensees.

An applicant for licensure as a physical therapist may take the examination after the application process has been completed and the application approved. The examination shall test entry-level competence related to physical therapy theory, examination, evaluation, diagnosis, prognosis, treatment intervention, prevention, and consultation.

An applicant for licensure as a physical therapist assistant may take the examination after the application process has been completed and the application approved. The examination shall test for requisite knowledge and skills in the technical application of physical therapy services.

An applicant for licensure who does not pass the examination on the first attempt may retake the examination one additional time without reapplication for licensure within six months of the first examination. Before the Director may approve an applicant for subsequent testing beyond two attempts, an applicant shall reapply for licensure and shall submit evidence satisfactory to the Director of having successfully completed additional clinical training or course work, or both, as determined by the Director.

The Director may require an examination designed to test the knowledge of the applicant regarding Vermont laws relating to physical therapy practice.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 227

(Adj. Sess.), § 6; amended

1989, No. 250

(Adj. Sess.), § 4(d);

2005, No. 27

, § 60;

2019, No. 178

(Adj. Sess.), § 13, eff. Oct. 1, 2020.

§ 2104.
Licensure by endorsement.

A person who is licensed under the laws of another jurisdiction and who desires licensure as a physical therapist or physical therapist assistant shall apply to the Director of the Office of Professional Regulation in writing on a form furnished by the Director, accompanied by the specified fee. The Director shall license those persons if he or she deems that they have met requirements in the other jurisdiction that are substantially equivalent to those of this State. In all other cases, the Director of the Office of Professional Regulation may make such regulations as are reasonable and necessary for the protection of the public to assure that the applicant under this section is professionally qualified.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 227

(Adj. Sess.), § 6; amended

1989, No. 250

(Adj. Sess.), § 4(d);

2005, No. 27

, § 61;

2007, No. 163

(Adj. Sess.), § 18.

§ 2105.
Temporary licensure pending endorsement.

The Director may issue a temporary license to practice as a physical therapist for a period not to exceed 90 days to a physical therapist currently licensed in another jurisdiction who has applied for licensure by endorsement in accordance with the statutes and rules governing the profession.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 227

(Adj. Sess.), § 6; amended

1989, No. 250

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

2007, No. 163

(Adj. Sess.), § 19.

§ 2106.
Repealed. 1997, No. 59, § 65(1), eff. June 30, 1997.

§ 2106a.
Repealed. 2005, No. 27, § 117(1).

§ 2107.
Renewals.

Licenses shall be renewed every two years upon payment of the required fee.

Biennially, the Director shall forward a renewal form to each license holder. Upon receipt of the completed form and the renewal fee, the Director shall issue a new license.

Any application for renewal of a license that has expired shall be accompanied by the renewal fee and late fee. A person shall not be required to pay renewal fees for years during which the license was lapsed.

The Director shall establish continuing competence requirements by rule as a condition of licensure renewal.

HISTORY:

Added

1999, No. 52

, § 13; amended

2005, No. 27

, § 62.

§ 2108.
Reinstatement.

If a physical therapist’s license has lapsed for more than five consecutive years, that person may have his or her license reinstated upon payment of all applicable renewal and reinstatement fees, and demonstration of competence to practice the profession by one or more of the following, as determined by the Director:

practice for a specified time under a limited or supervised license;

completion of a remedial course;

completion of continuing competence requirements;

passage of an examination approved by the Director; or

practice with a license in good standing in another jurisdiction.

HISTORY:

Added

2005, No. 27

, § 63; amended

2007, No. 163

(Adj. Sess.), § 20.